Florida, session 2026, SB1340.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (4) of 14 section 1008.25, Florida Statutes, and paragraph (a) of 15 subsection (9) of that section is amended, to read: 16 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 17 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 18 requirements.â 19 (4)âASSESSMENT AND SUPPORT.â 20 (d)âIf the coordinated screening and progress monitoring 21 system under subsection (9), or any district-approved screening 22 instrument, identifies a student as exhibiting characteristics 23 of dyslexia or dyscalculia, the school district shall: 24 1.âEnsure that the student is covered by a plan under 25 paragraph (b) which includes evidence-based interventions that 26 are specific to the identified characteristics of dyslexia or 27 dyscalculia and that are aligned, as appropriate, with the 28 interventions required under subsection (5) for reading and 29 subsection (6) for mathematics. 30 2.âTreat the screening result as reasonable suspicion that 31 the student may be a student with a disability for purposes of 32 s. 1003.57 and promptly seek parental consent to conduct an 33 initial evaluation consistent with state board rule and 34 applicable federal law. 35 3.âEnsure that screening activities and intervention 36 procedures, including interventions required under this 37 subsection and subsections (5) and (6), occur concurrently with 38 the evaluation process and are not used to delay or deny an 39 appropriate evaluation. 40 (9)âCOORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.â 41 (a)âThe Department of Education, in collaboration with the 42 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a 43 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress 44 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 45 Program and public schools. The system must: 46 1.âMeasure student progress in meeting the appropriate 47 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in 48 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by 49 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational 50 strengths and needs of students. 51 2.âFor students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 52 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral 53 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness, 54 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, 55 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a 56 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that 57 measures equivalent levels of growth. 58 3.âBe a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate 59 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and 60 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress; 61 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading 62 or mathematics, including identifying students with 63 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning 64 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by 65 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia 66 shall undergo further screening. Any student whose performance 67 in the system meets thresholds established by State Board of 68 Education rule in circumstances in which the system is not 69 capable of identifying characteristics of dyslexia or 70 dyscalculia must undergo further screening. The further 71 screening required under this subparagraph is used to refine 72 instructional planning and parental communication and is not a 73 prerequisite to the interventions or evaluation obligations 74 described in subsection (4). The State Board of Education shall 75 adopt rules establishing timelines, performance thresholds, and 76 parental notification requirements for further screening under 77 this subparagraph. Screening activities under this subsection 78 shall occur concurrently with the interventions and evaluation 79 obligations described in subsection (4) and may not be used to 80 delay or deny an appropriate evaluation. Beginning with the 81 2023-2024 school year, the coordinated screening and progress 82 monitoring system must be computer-adaptive. 83 4.âProvide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 84 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68. 85 5.âProvide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 86 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with 87 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and 88 parent communication. 89 6.âProvide baseline data to the department of each 90 studentâs readiness for kindergarten. The determination of 91 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each 92 studentâs initial progress monitoring assessment in 93 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a studentâs 94 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department 95 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 96 1002.68(4). 97 7.âAssess how well educational goals and curricular 98 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state 99 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the 100 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for 101 providers, districts, and schools. 102 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.